Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Chapter 4

Proceedings to Keep the Peace
[Repealed]

38-4-101 — 38-4-122. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 38-4-101 — 38-4-122 (Code 1858, §§ 4943-4964; Shan. §§ 6904-6925; Code 1932, §§ 11428-11449; Acts 1959, ch. 16, § 1; 1969, ch. 323, § 1; 1978, ch. 933, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 38-301 — 38-322; Acts 1993, ch. 115, § 2), concerning proceedings to keep the peace, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 360, § 1.